Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1681.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8340.4. Immunity for security officers of religious organizations.(a) Immunity.--Except as provided in subsection (b), in addition to any other applicable immunity or limitation on civil liability, a security officer of a religious organization shall be entitled to civil immunity for any injury or loss to property resulting from the security officer's actions in defense or in protection of the religious organization for which the security officer provided safety, security or protection services.(b) Exception.--The immunity provided under subsection (a) shall not apply to an act or omission that arises out of any 12345678910111213141516171819 reckless, malicious, grossly negligent or wanton action or conduct by the security officer.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Religious organization." A body or community of individuals that is organized primarily for the purpose of engaging in religious worship or promoting the spiritual development or well-being of individuals."Security officer." A volunteer of a religious organization who provides the following services for the religious organization as determined by the religious organization:(1) Protection of persons and property.(2) Monitoring visitors.(3) Deterrence, observation, detection or reporting of incidents and activities for the purpose of preventing the theft, conversion, concealment or misappropriation of personal property.(4) Deterrence, observation, detection or reporting of incidents and activities for the purpose of preventing any unauthorized or unlawful activity, including robbery, burglary, arson, criminal mischief, vandalism or trespass."Volunteer." An individual who provides services without an express or implied promise of remuneration.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1681PN2057 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425